Montana, session 2025, HB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 80-6-1102, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1102. Definitions. As used in this part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Bee" means any stage in the life cycle of a bee of the species Megachile rotundata (F),
commonly known as the alfalfa leaf-cutting bee.
(2) "Certification" means the process of analyzing bees and equipment by the committee
department to determine whether they meet required standards.
(3) "Chalkbrood" means a fungal disease that attacks larvae of the alfalfa leaf-cutting bee.
(4) "Committee" means the Montana alfalfa seed committee established in 2-15-3004.
(5)(3) "Department" means the department of agriculture established in 2-15-3001.
(6)(4) "Equipment" means shelters, trays, incubators, cell removers, tumblers, and other apparatus,
except nesting materials, used in rearing bees.
(7)(5) "Nest destroyer" means any organism that competes with the bee larvae for nest provisions.
(8)(6) "Nesting materials" means laminates, drilled boards, and other apparatus used in nesting bees.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
(9)(7) "Parasite" means an organism living in or on any stage of the alfalfa leaf-cutting bee obtaining
nutriment from the body of the bee.
(10)(8) "Pathogen" means an organism that causes disease in the alfalfa leaf-cutting bee.
(11)(9) "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, or corporation.
(12)(10)"Predator" means any organism or insect that preys on, devours, or destroys bees or nests.
(13)(11)"Wild trap" means to intentionally trap bees on property not owned or leased by the trapper."

Section 2. Section 80-6-1103, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1103. Committee Department responsibilities -- adoption of rules. (1) The committee
department is responsible for the administration of this part.
(2) The committee department shall by rule adopt minimum standards for the presence of
pathogens and parasites.
(3) The committee department may adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the presence
of predators and nest destroyers in bees to be certified, imported, quarantined, and possessed or controlled in
the state of Montana.
(4) The committee department may provide information and services relating to the rearing of
alfalfa leaf-cutting bees and alfalfa seed production.
(5) The committee department may enter into agreements with other governmental agencies or
private associations in carrying out the provisions of this part.
(6) In performing its duties under this part, the committee department may:
(a) enter upon any public or private premises to inspect equipment and sample bees;
(b) by rule establish quarantines to regulate the entry of bees, equipment, and nesting material into
areas of Montana specified in the quarantines;
(c) quarantine any bees, equipment, or nesting material found to be infected or contaminated at
levels exceeding importation or quarantine standards;
(d) order the disinfection, destruction, or removal of any bees, equipment, or nesting material that
does not meet importation or quarantine standards.
(7) Upon receiving notification of nesting material or bees that appear to be abandoned, the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
committee department shall contact the owner as soon as possible to correct the problem. If the owner cannot
be found, the nesting material or bees must be considered abandoned and the procedures for disposition of
abandoned property set out in Title 70, chapter 9, must be followed.
(8) (a) Whenever the committee department has reasonable cause to believe a person is in
possession of any bees or equipment in violation of this part or rules adopted under it, the committee
department may order a quarantine of the suspected bees or equipment and may require any person in
possession of the bees or equipment to hold them under specified conditions until notified otherwise in writing
by the committee department.
(b) The committee department shall release any quarantine upon finding that the bees and
equipment are in compliance with this part."

Section 3. Section 80-6-1105, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1105. Alfalfa leaf-cutting bees -- certification. (1) A person possessing or controlling alfalfa
leaf-cutting bees in the state of Montana may annually certify all or part of the person's bees as provided in this
section.
(2) To certify bees, a person shall file a completed application form provided by the department,
together with a fee set by rule. The applicant shall provide the following:
(a) name and place of residence;
(b) the general location and number of bees to be certified; and
(c) other relevant information as may be required by committee department rule.
(3) After receipt of an application for certification, a sample of the total population of bees to be
certified must be selected by the committee department or its agent in a manner prescribed by the committee
department. The sample must be analyzed for pathogens, parasites, predators, nest destroyers, and live larvae
count. If certification standards are met, the sample must be certified.
(4) All bees to be certified may be stored in containers that can be officially sealed after sampling
to maintain their certification identity.
(5) When the committee department has in its possession a completed application form, an
appropriate fee, and a report that the sample meets certification standards, it may issue a certificate for the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
bees.
(6) The committee department shall by rule specify the date by which any applicant shall apply for
recertification the following year."

Section 4. Section 80-6-1106, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1106. Bee laboratory authorized. The committee department or its agent may develop and
maintain a laboratory for the purpose of providing analytical services required to carry out the provisions of this
part. The laboratory may be authorized by the committee department to provide services to persons possessing
any bees or equipment on a fee-for-service basis."

Section 5. Section 80-6-1108, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1108. Restrictions on rearing, moving, and trapping of bees and movement of
equipment. (1) A person may not wild trap within 1 mile of registered bees without the written permission of the
registrant.
(2) A person may not move any quarantined bee or equipment except by special permit issued by
the committee department.
(3) A person may not wild trap or attempt to wild trap bees unless that person has been issued a
permit for that activity in accordance with rules adopted by the committee department. The committee
department shall by rule establish the permit fee."

Section 6. Section 80-6-1109, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1109. Fees to be set by rule -- account established. (1) Fees authorized to be charged by
this part must be set by committee department rule. The fees must be designed, when combined with other
revenue sources available to the committee department, to reimburse the committee department for costs
incurred in providing services and carrying out its duties under this part.
(2) There is an account in the state special revenue fund known as the leaf-cutting bee account for
use by the committee department. The account is made up of:
(a) fees collected under this part;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
(b) money collected as part of the alfalfa seed assessment provided for in 80-11-307 and allocated
to the account by the committee department; and
(c) any grants, donations, or gifts made to the committee department and designated by the
committee department for the purposes of this part.
(3) The committee department may direct the board of investments to invest money from the
account pursuant to the provisions of the unified investment program. The income from investments must be
credited to the leaf-cutting bee account."

Section 7. Section 80-6-1110, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1110. Violation -- penalty. A person who imports, possesses, controls, moves, or wild traps or
attempts to import, possess, control, move, or wild trap any bee or equipment in violation of this part or who
interferes with or attempts to interfere with the efforts of the committee department or its agent to perform its
duty under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than $300 or more
than $500 for the first conviction and not less than $300 or more than $1,000 for each subsequent conviction."

Section 8. Section 80-6-1111, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1111. Alfalfa leaf-cutting bees -- registration. (1) A person may not possess or control alfalfa
leaf-cutting bees in this state unless the bees are registered as provided in this section.
(2) To register bees, a person shall file a completed application form provided by the department,
together with the registration fee set by rule. The applicant shall provide the following:
(a) the name and place of residence;
(b) the general location of bees to be registered; and
(c) other relevant information as may be required by committee department rule.
(3) A registration is continuous until the registrant notifies the committee department of
cancellation."

Section 9. Section 80-6-1112, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-6-1112. Funding limitation. (1) The committee department shall expend only those funds
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
deposited in the special revenue account provided for in 80-6-1109 for the purposes of this part. In the event
that funds are insufficient to finance the costs of services under this part, the committee department may
reduce services accordingly.
(2) The committee department may contract lab services with a qualified person and charge
growers at cost on a per-sample basis.
(3) The committee department may levy a fee set by committee department rule not to exceed 30
cents for each 3,000 holes of nesting material deeper than 3 1/2 inches for the purpose of administering this
part and for the sampling and testing of bees. For nesting material 3 1/2 inches deep or less, the fee may not
exceed 16 cents per 2,000 holes of nesting material.
(4) Fees must be based on all nesting materials that are in field use on July 15 of each year. Fees
are due on November 1 of each year.
(5) The amount of fees paid must be credited against a grower's cost of sampling and certification.
(6) Certification fees for drilled boards or loose cells may not exceed committee department cost."

Section 10. Section 80-11-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-11-303. Definitions. As used in this part the following definitions apply:
(1) "Committee" means the Montana alfalfa seed committee established in 2-15-3004.
(2)(1) "Dealer" means any person, partnership, association, corporation, cooperative, or other
business unit or device that first handles, packs, ships, buys, and sells alfalfa seed or that acts as sales or
purchasing agent, broker, or factor of alfalfa seed.
(3)(2) "Grower" means any landowner personally engaged in growing alfalfa seed, a tenant
personally engaged in growing alfalfa seed, or both the owner and the tenant jointly, and includes a person,
partnership, association, corporation, cooperative organization, trust, sharecropper, or any and all other
business units entities, devices, and arrangements that grow alfalfa seed or are engaged in the pollination of
alfalfa seed.
(4)(3) "Handled in the primary channels of trade" means the time when any alfalfa seed is delivered
under a sales contract, sold, or delivered for shipment and sale."

- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
Section 11. Section 80-11-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-11-304. Powers of the committee Department powers -- rulemaking. The committee
department may:
(1) provide, through the department of agriculture, for the administration and enforcement of this
part;
(2) enter into contracts in the name of the committee;
(3) authorize the purchase of all office equipment or supplies and incur all other reasonable and
necessary expenses and obligations required to carry out the provisions of this part;
(4) become a member of and purchase membership in trade organizations and subscribe to and
purchase trade bulletins, journals, and other trade publications;
(5) plan and conduct a research program to improve the quality of alfalfa seed, develop and
improve control measures for disease and pests that attack alfalfa and alfalfa seed pollinators, improve alfalfa
growing culture, disseminate information among the growers and dealers of the state, financially support the
alfalfa leaf-cutting bee program provided for in Title 80, chapter 6, part 11, and enter into research contracts
and other agreements as necessary;
(6) plan and conduct a publicity and sales promotion campaign to increase the sale and use of
Montana alfalfa seed and enter into publicity and sales promotion contracts and other agreements as
necessary;
(7) in cooperation with the director of the department of agriculture, establish and maintain the
executive offices of the committee at any location in the state. The location may be changed at the discretion of
the director and the committee.
(8) recommend rules and orders to be adopted for the exercise of its power and the performance
of its duties, in accordance with the Montana Administrative Procedure Act;
(1) adopt rules for the exercise of its power and the performance of its duties under this part in
accordance with the Montana Administrative Procedure Act;
(9)(2) cooperate with any local, state, or national organization or agency, whether voluntary or
created by the law of any state or the United States government, engaged in work or activities similar to the
work and activities of the committee and enter into contracts or agreements with the any local, state, or national
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
organizations or agencies for carrying on a joint campaign of research, education, product protection, publicity,
and reciprocal enforcement of these objectives; and
(10)(3) accept grants, donations, and gifts from any source for expenditure for any purpose consistent
with Title 80, chapter 6, part 11, or this part, including a purpose specified as a condition of a grant, donation, or
gift."

Section 12. Section 80-11-307, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-11-307. Assessment on alfalfa seed. (1) There is hereby levied upon all alfalfa seed grown in
this state and sold through commercial channels an assessment of 1/2 of 1% of the grower's price received at
the point of first sale.
(2) If it appears from an investigation that the revenue from the assessment levied under
subsection (1) is inadequate to accomplish the purposes of this part, the committee shall file with the director of
agriculture a report showing the necessity of the industry, extent of public convenience, interest, and necessity,
and probable revenue from the additional assessment desired to be levied. The the department director of
agriculture may thereupon increase the assessment to a sum not to exceed 1% of the grower's price received
at the point of first sale. No An increase may not be made prior to filing of the report and recommendation by
the committee to holding a public meeting for input from growers."

Section 13. Section 80-11-309, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-11-309. Refund of assessment. Any person who has paid assessments to the department may
request the department to refund all or any portion of the assessment levied under the rules of the department
and paid by the producer person. All such requests must be in writing, filed not later than August 1 of each
calendar year for the preceding crop year, and must be on forms to be available without cost to all producers
persons who pay assessments."

Section 14. Section 80-11-310, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-11-310. Deposit and disbursement of funds -- investment -- hearing. (1) As soon as possible
after receipt, all money received by the department from the assessment levied under 80-11-307 and all other
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 171.1
money received must be deposited in the alfalfa seed account in the state special revenue fund.
(2) (a) All money referred to in subsection (1) may be appropriated to the committee department
and may be used only for the payment of expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of Title 80, chapter 6,
part 11, and this part.
(b) The committee department may transfer money from the account to the alfalfa leaf-cutting bee
account provided for in 80-6-1109.
(c) The committee may be assessed costs by the department may charge the account with all
reasonable and necessary costs for the services it provides upon request or pursuant to 2-15-121. The costs
charged must have a substantial relationship to the cost of services supplied.
(3) Money received under 80-11-312, 80-11-313, and this section that is not immediately required
for the purposes of Title 80, chapter 6, part 11, and this part must be invested under provisions of the unified
investment program established in Title 17, chapter 6, part 2. The income from the investment must be
deposited in the alfalfa seed account in the state special revenue fund.
(4) Money received under 80-11-312, 80-11-313, and this section may be appropriated to the
committee department for the purposes of Title 80, chapter 6, part 11, and this part.
(5) The department shall hold at least one public meeting every biennium for the alfalfa industry
and provide input as to the continuation of the assessment and the preferred uses of the money."

NEW SECTION. Section 15. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
2-15-3004. Montana alfalfa seed committee -- composition -- allocation.
80-6-1104. Advisory duty of committee.
80-11-302. Findings -- purpose.
80-11-305. Compensation -- per diem.

NEW SECTION. Section 16. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 171